District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.07

Police officer’s report.

(a)

Whenever the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) makes a written report on an accident involving a motor vehicle, the report shall include the following information:

(1)

Whether a mobile telephone or other electronic device was present in the motor vehicle;

(2)

Whether the use of a mobile telephone or other electronic device by a motor vehicle operator may have contributed to the cause of the accident; and

(3)

Whether any other distraction may have contributed to the cause of the accident.

(b)

The MPD shall provide a copy of each accident report to the District Department of Transportation.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 7, 51 DCR 1541